Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 33.30.191.
Employment of prison inmates.

It is the policy of the state that prisoners be productively employed for as many hours each day as feasible.

The commissioner may enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with any public agency for the performance of conservation projects. After June 14, 2006, the commissioner may enter into a contract with an individual or private organization or public agency for the employment of prisoners if the commissioner consults with local union organizations before contracting and ensures that the contract will not result in the displacement of employed workers, be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality, or impair existing contracts for services. A contract with an individual or private organization must require payment to the commissioner of at least the minimum wage required by AS

23.10.065

for each hour worked by a prisoner. The wage required under the contract, multiplied by the total hours worked by inmates, must be paid weekly, or for another period as required by the contract.

The commissioner may direct a prisoner to participate in a type of productive employment listed in (g)(1) and (3) — (5) of this section while the prisoner is confined in a correctional facility. A prisoner who refuses to participate in productive employment inside a correctional facility when directed under this section is subject to disciplinary sanctions imposed in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

In employing prison inmates, the department shall comply with federal and state health and safety regulations, except for providing workers’ compensation under AS 23.30.

The provisions of AS 23 do not apply to the employment of prison inmates.

Prison inmates productively employed under this section are not state employees nor do they have the rights or privileges given to state employees, including the right to participate in collective bargaining.

In this section, “productively employed” includes the following kinds of employment:

routine maintenance and support services essential to the operation of a correctional facility;

education, including both academic and vocational;

public conservation projects, including wildland fire prevention and control, forest and watershed enhancement, recreational area development, construction and maintenance of trails and campsites, fish and game enhancement, soil conservation, and forest watershed revegetation;

renovation, repair, or alteration of existing correctional facilities as permitted by law; and

other work performed inside or outside of a correctional facility under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 49 SLA 1997; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 58 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d)-(f) were enacted as (e)-(g), respectively. Relettered in 2006, at which time existing subsection (d) was relettered as subsection (g) and an internal reference to the subsection was changed accordingly.

Cross references. —

For authority to use prisoners for work on trails and campsites, see AS

41.21.858(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

Sec. 33.30.193.
Standard applicable to allowing prisoners access to and use of legal reference materials and legal assistance.

If the commissioner imposes a restriction on access to and use of legal reference materials by or legal assistance of a prisoner in a state correctional facility, a court may not enter an order giving relief to the prisoner unless the court first finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that enforcement or application of the restriction hinders the prisoner from having access to and use of the legal reference materials or legal assistance

in order to gain meaningful access to a court for the purpose of challenging

the prisoner’s conviction or sentence; or

the conditions of the prisoner’s confinement; or

in circumstances in which a state court has specifically determined that a provision of the state constitution necessarily requires a prisoner to have access to and use of the legal reference materials or legal assistance.

History.

(§ 8 ch 49 SLA 1997)

Sec. 33.30.201.
Compensation of prison inmates; deductions; disbursement; liens.

Each prisoner who is productively employed, as defined in AS

33.30.191(g)(1)

or (3) — (5), may receive for that work compensation at a rate determined by the commissioner under this section if the money is available from legislative appropriations. Compensation established by the commissioner under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the minimum wage established in AS

23.10.065

; however, if required to comply with a federal statute or regulation, a higher compensation may be established by the commissioner.

If compensation established under (a) of this section is 50 percent or more of the minimum wage established in AS

23.10.065

, the commissioner may deduct the cost of confinement of the prisoner up to the statewide average cost of confinement before disbursements are made under (c) of this section.

The commissioner shall disburse compensation received under (a) of this section, after any deduction required by (b) of this section, in the following order of priority:

for support of the prisoner’s dependents, if any;

to reimburse the state for compensation awarded under AS 18.67 resulting from the prisoner’s criminal conduct;

to pay a civil judgment resulting from the prisoner’s criminal conduct;

to pay a restitution or fine of the prisoner ordered by a sentencing court;

for the payment of fees for the prisoner’s utilities services under AS

33.30.017

;

for the purchase of clothing and commissary items for the prisoner’s personal use.

A prisoner’s compensation remaining after any deductions under (b) of this section and disbursements under (c) of this section is to be credited to the prisoner and, except as provided in (e) of this section, must be retained by the department for the primary purpose of being available to the prisoner at the time of release. The commissioner shall maintain individual prisoner accounts for those earnings. The commissioner may, however, permit the prisoner to draw on a portion of that money for other purposes that the commissioner considers appropriate.

If a prisoner escapes, a portion of the retained compensation of the prisoner, as determined by the commissioner, is to be forfeited. The commissioner shall deposit forfeited compensation in the general fund.

Except for execution by the state under AS

09.38.030(f)

, only the prisoner compensation retained by the commissioner under (d) of this section is subject to lien, attachment, garnishment, execution, or similar procedures to encumber money or property.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am §§ 6, 7 ch 58 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (a) of this section, “AS

33.30.191

(g)(1) or (3) — (5)” was substituted for “AS

33.30.191

(d)(1) or (3) — (5)” to reflect the 2006 relettering in AS 33.30.191.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 33.30.211.
Transmission of documents.

When a prisoner is admitted to a correctional facility, a copy of the commitment shall be delivered with the prisoner as evidence of the authority of the correctional facility to hold the prisoner.

When a person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, copies of the pre-sentence report, sentencing report prepared under AS

12.55.025

, and any other information of the probation office or of the court that may affect the person’s rehabilitation shall be transmitted to the superintendent of the correctional facility in which the prisoner will be confined.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations providing for the security, confidentiality, and use of documents transmitted under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Rights of prisoners in private prisons. 119 A.L.R.5th 1.

Sec. 33.30.216.
Copies of records for child support purposes.

If a copy of a record prepared or maintained by or on behalf of the commissioner for a person in the custody of the commissioner is requested by the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, the official custodian of the record shall provide the requesting agency with a certified copy of the record. If the record is prepared or maintained in an electronic data base, the official custodian of the record may provide the requesting agency with a copy of the electronic record and a statement certifying its contents. The agency receiving information under this section may use the information only for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 142 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sec. 33.30.221.
Superintendent of correctional facility may administer oaths and acknowledgments.

The superintendent of a correctional facility or the superintendent’s assistant may administer oaths to and take acknowledgments from a prisoner, but may not request or accept compensation from a prisoner for acts performed under this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For communications, see 22 AAC 5, art. 8.

Secs. 33.30.225 — 33.30.227.
Employment of prison inmates. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.231.
Telephone access and monitoring inside correctional institutions.

A prisoner shall have reasonable access to a telephone except when access is suspended as punishment for conviction of a rule infraction or pending a hearing for a rule infraction involving telephone abuse. A suspension under this subsection must be reasonable in length and may not prohibit telephone communication between the prisoner and an attorney or between the prisoner and the office of the ombudsman.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 56 SLA 1990.]

Notwithstanding AS

42.20.300

and

42.20.310

, in order to preserve the security and orderly administration of the correctional facility and to protect the public, the commissioner shall monitor or record the telephone conversations of prisoners. The commissioner shall post a warning by each telephone informing prisoners that calls may be monitored or recorded. The monitoring or recording may be conducted on all calls or selectively or in some other limited manner as determined by the commissioner to be appropriate. A recording of a telephone call made under this subsection shall be kept confidential, and access to the recording and its contents is limited to persons who are acting within the scope of their official duties and whose access to specific recordings has been authorized by the facility superintendent. A telephone call between an attorney and a prisoner or between the office of the ombudsman and a prisoner may not be monitored or recorded except when authorized by a court.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may contract under AS 36.30 for telephone services for use by a prisoner.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 56 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 9 ch 49 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For communications, see 22 AAC 5, art. 8.

Sec. 33.30.241.
Effect of judgment of conviction on civil rights.

A person who is convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude as defined in AS

15.80.010

is disqualified from voting in a state or municipal election until the person’s unconditional discharge.

A person who is convicted of a felony is disqualified from serving as a juror until the person’s unconditional discharge.

In this section “unconditional discharge” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (a), “AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “AS 15.60.010” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.010.

Cross references. —

For loss and restoration of voting rights after certain felony convictions, see AS

15.05.030

.

Sec. 33.30.250.
Work furlough. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.251.
Disposal of abandoned personal property.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, it is the obligation of each person committed to the custody of the commissioner to provide for the appropriate disposition of all of the person’s property remaining at a correctional facility within 90 days of the date of the person’s release or transfer from the correction facility.

The commissioner shall provide for the shipment to the receiving facility of a reasonable amount of the prisoner’s property, as determined by the commissioner, when the prisoner is transferred from one correctional facility to another.

A prisoner’s personal property that remains at a correctional facility after 90 days from the date of the prisoner’s release or transfer is considered abandoned, and shall be delivered to the Department of Administration for disposal under AS

44.68.110

.

The state is not liable for any loss or damage to personal property properly determined to be abandoned under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 33.30.260.
Rehabilitation furloughs. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.261.
Excess money as contraband.

A prisoner who possesses money in an amount greater than that permitted by the commissioner is subject to disciplinary sanctions under regulations adopted by the commissioner.

Money in the possession of a prisoner in an amount greater than that permitted by the commissioner is contraband. If, after a hearing under regulations adopted by the commissioner, a prisoner is found to have been in possession of contraband under this section, the contraband shall be forfeited and deposited into the general fund.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

Sec. 33.30.270.
Employment of imprisoned persons. [Repealed, § 6 ch 53 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 33.30.271.
Forfeiture of property.

A conviction of a person for a crime does not work a forfeiture of property, except in cases where a forfeiture is expressly provided by law.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Sec. 33.30.280.
Credit for labor while imprisoned. [Repealed, § 6 ch 53 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 33.30.281.
Crime against sentenced prisoner.

A person who commits a crime against a sentenced prisoner is punishable as if the prisoner was not sentenced and incarcerated.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Secs. 33.30.282 — 33.30.290.
Correctional restitution centers. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.291.
Treaties.

If a treaty in effect between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer or exchange of prisoners sentenced to serve a term of incarceration to the country where they are citizens or nationals, the commissioner may, on behalf of the state and subject to the terms of the treaty, consent to the transfer or exchange of prisoners and take any other action necessary to initiate the participation of the state in the treaty.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Sec. 33.30.292.
Designation of victims’ representative.

If more than one person who qualifies as a victim under AS

12.55.185

requests notice under this chapter, the commissioner shall designate one person for purposes of receiving the notice required and of exercising the rights granted by this chapter.

History.

(§ 22 ch 59 SLA 1989)

Sec. 33.30.295.
Review of prisoner disciplinary decisions.

A prisoner may obtain judicial review by the superior court of a final disciplinary decision by the department only if the prisoner alleges specific facts establishing a violation of the prisoner’s fundamental constitutional rights that prejudiced the prisoner’s right to a fair adjudication. An appeal shall be commenced by the prisoner filing a notice of appeal and other required documents in accordance with AS 09.19 and the applicable rules of court governing administrative appeals that do not conflict with AS 09.19. Unless the appeal is not accepted for filing under AS

09.19.010

or is dismissed under AS

09.19.020

, a record of the proceedings shall be prepared by the department, consisting of the original papers and exhibits submitted in the disciplinary process and a cassette tape of the disciplinary hearing. The record shall be prepared and transmitted in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing administrative appeals.

A disciplinary decision may not be reversed

unless the court finds that the prisoner’s fundamental constitutional rights were violated in the course of the disciplinary process, and that the violation prejudiced the prisoner’s right to a fair adjudication;

because the department failed to follow hearing requirements set out in state statutes and regulations, unless the prisoner was prejudiced by the denial of a right guaranteed by the Alaska Constitution or United States Constitution; if such prejudice is found, the court shall enter judgment as provided in (c) of this section and remand the case to the department; or

because of insufficient evidence if the record described in (a) of this section shows that the disciplinary decision was based on some evidence that could support the decision reached.

The court shall enter judgment setting aside or affirming the disciplinary decision without limiting or controlling the discretion vested in the department to allocate resources within the department and to control security and administration within the prison system.

History.

(§ 14 ch 79 SLA 1995)

Secs. 33.30.300 — 33.30.900.
Crime against convict in penitentiary. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]